District of Columbia statutes.
16-1046

Other remedies.

A protected individual who pursues remedies under this subchapter is not precluded from pursuing other legal or equitable remedies against the respondent.

History

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-296, § 2(c), 50 DCR 320

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.